Maine, session 132, LD1074.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 17-A MRSA §152-A, sub-§2, as amended by PL 2019, c. 113, Pt. C, §58,
is further amended to read:
2. Aggravated attempted murder is a Class A crime except that, notwithstanding
section 1604, subsection 1, paragraph A, the sentence for aggravated attempted murder is
imprisonment for life or a definite period of imprisonment for any term of years. The
existence of an aggravating circumstance serves only as a precondition for the court to
consider a life sentence. The court also may impose as part of the sentence a period of
probation of any term of years pursuant to section 1804, subsection 4-A.
Sec. 2. 17-A MRSA §1804, sub-§1, as enacted by PL 2019, c. 113, Pt. A, §2, is
amended to read:
1. Limit on length of probation. Except as provided in subsections 2, 3, 4, 4-A, 5
and 6, the period of probation for a person may not exceed:
A. For a Class A crime, 4 years;
B. For a Class B crime, 3 years;
C. For a Class C crime, 2 years; and
D. For a Class D or Class E crime, one year.
Sec. 3. 17-A MRSA §1804, sub-§4, as enacted by PL 2019, c. 113, Pt. A, §2, is
amended to read:
4. Exception to limits when person sentenced as repeat sexual assault offender.
The period of probation for a person sentenced as a repeat sexual assault offender pursuant
to section 253‑A, subsection 1 is may be any term of years.
Sec. 4. 17-A MRSA §1804, sub-§4-A is enacted to read:
Page 1 - 132LR1350(03)

4-A. Exception to limits when person sentenced for aggravated attempted
murder. The period of probation for a person sentenced for aggravated attempted murder
pursuant to section 152-A, subsection 2 may be any term of years.
Page 2 - 132LR1350(03)